Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska16-1114
Merger; deemed permanent.

Merger according to the First-Class City Merger Act is deemed permanent, and no withdrawal or dissolution shall be permitted.

Laws 2008, LB1056, § 14.